District of Columbia statutes.
8-231.02

Prohibitions.

(a)

All dwelling units, common areas of multifamily properties, and child-occupied facilities constructed prior to 1978 shall be maintained free of lead-based paint hazards.

(b)

No person shall apply a lead-based paint or glaze to any surface, including the interior and exterior surfaces, of any residential, public, or commercial building, bridge, or other structure or superstructure, or on any paved surface.

(c)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the District government may deny any license, registration, or permit relating to the use or occupancy of a child-occupied facility or dwelling unit to an owner of that property if the owner is in violation of this subchapter.

Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-381, § 3, 56 DCR 1596
Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-348, § 2(b), 58 DCR 717
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 60(b), 59 DCR 6190
D.C. Law 18-348, in subsec. (a), deleted “March 1,” following “prior to”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 deleted the comma following “1978” in (a).